Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 1. Powers

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

10 Am. Jur. 2d Banks and Financial Institutions §§ 109 to 191.

9 C.J.S. Banks and Banking §§ 5 to 31; 230 to 481.

§ 13-2-101.
Generally.

Each bank may:

Make contracts in its corporate name;

Sue and be sued;

Lend money on real and personal securities;

Buy, sell and discount bills of exchange, notes and all other written evidence of debt except as otherwise provided;

Receive notes, buy and sell gold and silver coins and bullion where permitted by federal law;

Collect and pay over money;

Transact all other business pertaining to banking subject to the provisions and restrictions of this act;

Operate a savings department;

Operate a trust department and exercise all powers enumerated by W.S. 13-5-510(b) and

34-29-104

;

Act as executor, administrator, trustee, receiver, assignee or guardian of any estate, minor, incompetent or other persons subject to guardianship, and accept appointments by any court in connection with any of the foregoing. In the case of such appointment, or in case the bank shall be named as executor in any will or assignee of any assignment for the benefit of creditors, the bank shall not be required to give any bond or security unless directed by an order of the court making such appointment, or having jurisdiction of such will or assignment;

Sell insurance or annuities, provided however, all bank-related sales of insurance and annuities shall be in accordance with the Wyoming Insurance Code and subject to all other applicable state and federal laws and rules and regulations governing bank-related sale of insurance or annuities;

Engage in any activity that is usual or incidental to the business of banking, subject to the prior written approval of the commissioner. The commissioner shall not approve a request to engage in an incidental activity if he finds that the requested activity will adversely affect the safety and soundness of the bank; and

Engage in any activity in which a federally chartered insured depository institution as defined by W.S. 13-2-802(a)(ix) operating within this state is authorized to engage, as approved by rule by the commissioner.

Insurance underwriting shall not be approved as usual or incidental to the business of banking under this act, whether for a bank or an operating subsidiary, unless permitted for a federally chartered insured depository institution as defined by W.S. 13-2-802(a)(ix).

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, §§ 30, 39; 1927, ch. 100, § 1; R.S. 1931, §§ 10-130, 10-141; Laws 1933, ch. 113, § 1; C.S. 1945, §§ 35-131, 35-144; W.S. 1957, §§ 13-7, 13-20; Laws 1971, ch. 47, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1979, ch. 34, § 1; 1988, ch. 59, § 1; 1999, ch. 42, § 2; 2019 ch. 13, § 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 91, § 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 186, § 4(b), effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 13, § 2, effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(ix), substituted “13-5-510(b)” for “13-5-101(b).”

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 91, § 2, effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(ix), added “and

34-29-104

.”

The third 2019 amendment, by ch. 186 § 4(b), effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(ix), substituted “W.S. 13-5-510(b) and

34-29-104

” for “W.S. 13-5-101(b).”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 13-1-101(a)(xiv).

Cashier's check issued by bank to pay debt of another

is presumptively within its powers, because it has lawful authority to obtain money, commercial paper or other lawful security for issue of check before it emits it. Mine & Smelter Supply Co. v. Stockgrowers' Bank, 173 F. 859, 1909 U.S. App. LEXIS 5113 (8th Cir. Wyo. 1909).

Funds derived from enforcement of stockholder's liability

are general assets of failed institutions and must be used to make good the contracts, debts or engagements thereof, and both savings depositors and commercial depositors as creditors have right in common to look for the payment of engagements and debts to them. Hodgell v. Wilde, 52 Wyo. 310, 74 P.2d 336,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1937).

Funds collected by the examiner from stockholder's liability should be distributed to savings depositors and commercial depositors on basis of the unpaid portions of the claims in each department after all assets in each department have been collected and applied. Hodgell v. Wilde, 52 Wyo. 310, 74 P.2d 336,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1937).

Preference of savings depositors upon insolvency. —

Upon insolvency of a bank, depositors in savings department are entitled to preference relative to investments made with their deposits. Wilde v. Richards, 49 Wyo. 408, 55 P.2d 476,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 1936).

Transfer of unsecured note from commercial to savings department. —

Depositor, whose unsecured note was transferred from commercial to savings department without his knowledge after bank's insolvency and after he had been dissuaded from paying note, was entitled to retransfer of note to commercial department, restoration of securities exchanged therefor to savings department and to set off liability on note against bank's liability on deposit in commercial department. Wilde v. Richards, 49 Wyo. 408, 55 P.2d 476,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 1936).

Intervention. —

Intervening depositors could not require removal of receiver who was bank's cashier and a director, on ground that he failed to comply with provision that bank may invest 90% of savings department funds in government bonds or unencumbered realty, where it did not appear interveners had deposited any funds in savings department and no action against receiver was contemplated. State ex rel. Howell v. Bank of Glenrock, 36 Wyo. 125, 253 P. 665,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1927).

Failure of directors to know bank's condition. —

State bank directors' failure to know of condition of bank is not intentional or knowing violation of statute so as to make them personally liable for loss, unless failure arises from deliberate or reckless conduct. Webb v. Cash, 35 Wyo. 398, 250 P. 1,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1926).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Power and capacity of bank to take devise or bequest, 8 ALR2d 454.

Banking corporation's power to enter into partnership or joint venture, 60 ALR2d 917.

§ 13-2-102.
Perpetual duration.

A bank shall have perpetual duration except as otherwise provided by the articles of incorporation.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 160, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 13-48.7; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1.

§ 13-2-103.
Federal deposit insurance.

All banks, except special purpose depository institutions, shall obtain insurance of their deposits by the United States and shall subscribe for insurance of deposit accounts by the federal deposit insurance corporation (FDIC).

Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting a special purpose depository institution from obtaining FDIC insurance, if available.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 86,§ 2; C.S. 1945, § 35-802; W.S. 1957, § 13-108; Laws 1977, ch. 67,§ 1; 1988, ch. 59, § 1; 2019 ch. 92, § 3, effective October 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective October 1, 2019, designated former undesignated paragraph as present (a), and added “except special purpose depository institutions”; and added (b).